District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2706

Employment of unlicensed person; exemption.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1887, 24 Stat. 427, ch. 272, § 6
Mar. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 1284, ch. 545
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1238, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2406.
1973 Ed., § 2-1506.